Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 10. State Budget Department
§ 9-2-1012.
Duties of the department; transmittal of standard budget and manual; return of completed exception and expanded budgets; submission to governor; disposition of excess general fund appropriations; submission of selected budget information to joint appropriations committee.

The department shall transmit a standard budget and a manual of instruction for the preparation of exception and expanded budgets to entities on or before August 15 of odd numbered years. On or before September 15 of odd numbered years entities shall return the completed exception and expanded budgets.

The director of the department after compiling the requested budget estimates and related information collected from the several agencies of the state shall submit the overall state budget estimate and related information along with their comments and recommendations to the governor no later than November 1 of each budget period.

The governor may, upon examining the budget estimates and requests and after consultation with each agency, approve, disapprove, alter or revise the estimates in accordance with applicable state and federal laws.

The governor through the department may provide for public hearings on any and all agency estimates or requests or other fiscal matters and may require the attendance at such hearings of representatives of the agencies.

In preparing the overall state budget for distribution to the legislature, including any supplemental, budget shortfall or other emergency changes to the budget, the governor shall recommend to the legislature that not less than five percent (5%) of estimated general fund receipts for the next biennial budget period shall be appropriated from the general fund to the budget reserve account within the earmarked fund. This appropriation shall be in addition to any fund balance within the budget reserve account. At the end of each biennial budget period, general fund appropriations for the biennium in excess of expenditures including encumbrances during the biennium, as identified by the state auditor in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

9-2-1008

and

9-4-207

, shall be transferred into the budget reserve account. All funds in the budget reserve account shall be invested by the state treasurer and earnings therefrom shall be credited into the general fund. Appropriations to the account shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period. Expenditures from the budget reserve account shall be by legislative appropriation only.

In addition to subsection (b) of this section and not later than October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the director of the department shall file with the legislative service office a copy of the base budget, standard budget estimate and accompanying base budget forms required under W.S. 9-2-1011(c) for each entity. The legislative service office shall provide copies of the information filed under this subsection to the joint appropriations committee.

The department of administration and information shall submit to the department and the joint appropriations committee within the time periods specified in subsection (a) of this section its recommendations regarding state employee compensation. The department shall consider those recommendations in developing budgets and submitting recommendations to the governor pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. When distributing the overall state budget to the legislature, the governor shall summarize the manner in which the proposed budget addresses the recommendations of the department of administration and information.

If the governor exercises his authority provided by W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(VI) to create an at-will employment contract position, the governor shall seek continued authorization for that position by a budget request in the next session of the legislature. If authorization for the at-will employee contract position is not specifically approved in the general appropriations bill, the position shall terminate and shall not be reauthorized in the future without prior legislative approval.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, §§ 15 to 18; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:63 to 9-276.18:66; Laws 1975, ch. 174, § 1; 1976, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-2015 to 9-3-2018; Laws 1980, ch. 63, § 200; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 64, § 200; 1984, ch. 62, § 200; 1993, ch. 223, § 3; 2001, ch. 17, § 1; 2007, ch. 37, § 1; 2015 ch. 180, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to state auditor and state treasurer, see §§

9-1-401

through

9-1-417

.

As to general fund, see §

9-4-204

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (g).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e), inserted “including any supplemental or emergency changes to the budget,” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 18 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, added (h).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 118 § 2, effective July 1, 2016, in the first sentence of (e) inserted “budget shortfall” following “supplemental,” inserted “other” preceding “emergency,” and made a stylistic change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, in the section heading, substituted “the department” for “budget division,” deleted “interim” preceding “committee”; deleted “through the budget division” following “department” in the first sentence of (a); deleted “and administrator of the budget division” following “department” in (b); in (f), substituted “director of the department” for “administrator of the budget division” in the first sentence, deleted “interim” preceding “committee” in the second sentence; in the first sentence of (g), substituted “department” for “budget division,” deleted “interim” preceding “committee,” deleted “budget division and” preceding “department” in the second sentence; and substituted “9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(VI)” for “9-2-1022(a)(xi)(F)(VI)” in the first sentence of (h).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “department of administration and information” for “state employee compensation commission” twice in (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides: “To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-2-1013.
State budget; distribution of copies to legislators; copies and reports of authorizations; interfund loans.

On or before the third Monday in November of the year preceding the year the legislature convenes in budget session, the governor shall distribute to each legislator electronic, or upon request printed, copies of the state budget, covering the next biennial budget period beginning on July 1 of the ensuing year, containing the itemized requests of the agencies for appropriations or other funds, estimated revenues and receipts to the state, and his recommendations and conclusions. The state budget shall include:

Expenditures incurred in the two (2) previous fiscal years and estimates of expenditures for the ensuing two (2) fiscal years;

Revenues during the two (2) previous fiscal years and estimated receipts for the ensuing two (2) fiscal years;

The indebtedness and obligations of the state;

The condition of the various funds and the state treasury as a whole;

A general summary of the economic and social conditions of the state;

Recommendations relative to state program goals and objectives.

The department shall furnish to the legislative service office copies of all authorizations by the governor pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1005(b) within ten (10) days following the authorization. The legislative service office shall make quarterly reports of all authorizations by the governor to the legislative management council and the joint appropriations committee. The furnishing of copies of authorizations required under this subsection shall be in addition to the notice required by W.S. 9-2-1005(b).

Preparation of supplemental budgets for presentation in general sessions shall also be made within the time frame of W.S.

9-2-1012

and this section.

In addition to the items contained in subsection (a) of this section and notwithstanding any other recommendations made by the governor, the state budget shall also include the governor’s recommendations for appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget period, subject to the following:

The state budget shall include the governor’s recommendations for a total appropriation from the school foundation program account and based upon recommendations of the select school facilities committee under W.S.

28-11-301

, a total appropriation for school capital construction purposes for both fiscal years;

The total recommended appropriations under this subsection for any two (2) fiscal year budget period shall not exceed the total estimated revenues for that two (2) year period. The total estimated revenues computed under this paragraph shall not include increases in existing revenue sources which would be available to the state only after enactment of legislation in addition to existing law, but shall include the unencumbered balances in all other accounts in all other expendable funds subject to this section, and as further provided herein, as those funds are identified in accordance with standards promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board, but specifically excluding pension funds, nonexpendable trust funds, debt service funds and intragovernmental funds, that would be available for that budget period. Funds within the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(b), the common school permanent fund reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(f) funds within the legislative stabilization reserve account in excess of the limitation under subparagraph (iii)(C) of this section, or funds within five percent (5%) of estimated general fund receipts for the next biennium to be appropriated to the budget reserve account as required by W.S. 9-2-1012(e) shall not be included in total estimated revenues computed under this paragraph. Funds from a contingent appropriation shall not be included as an estimated source of revenue or funds available unless those funds previously had been authorized to be expended within the fiscal period covering the budget period of the recommendation;

The total recommended appropriations under this subsection shall not include any of the following:

The diversion of any existing revenue sources which diversion would require enactment of legislation in addition to existing law;

The transfer of funds from an account to another account except transfers from the budget reserve account;

An appropriation from the legislative stabilization reserve account, to the extent the recommended appropriation together with any appropriation under W.S.

9-2-1014

.3, other recommended contingent appropriation or other recommended appropriation from the legislative stabilization reserve account would exceed in any fiscal year five percent (5%) of the balance of that account as of the first day of the fiscal year in which the recommendation is made;

The transfer of funds from any contingent appropriation shall not be included, unless those funds previously had been authorized to be expended within the fiscal period covering the budget period of the recommendation by law other than W.S.

9-2-1014

.2 and 9-2-1014.3 and remain unexpended, unencumbered and unobligated. Unencumbered, unobligated funds from a contingent appropriation authorized for one (1) fiscal year under W.S. 9-2-1014.2 or from an appropriation under W.S. 9-2-1014.3 shall lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall not be included in the recommended appropriations for any subsequent fiscal year.

As used in this subsection, “appropriations” include specific legislative authorization to expend state revenues contained in a budget bill that is enacted into law, an amount to be expended from an account which does not require additional specific legislative authorization, the transfer of funds from the budget reserve account to another account or a specific statutory distribution of a revenue source;

For each submitted budget the governor shall:

Specify the exercise of any authority under W.S. 9-2-1014.2 in the current fiscal biennium;

Identify any structural budget deficit or budget shortfall he believes exists within the fiscal biennium for which the budget is submitted or will exist within the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium;

Include recommendations for the amount of contingent appropriations which should be made or supplemented for the existing fiscal biennium and each of the two (2) immediately succeeding fiscal biennia. The governor shall not recommend a contingent appropriation from the legislative reserve account which would result in the total of all appropriations, including any appropriation under W.S. 9-2-1014.3, in any fiscal year exceeding five percent (5%) of the balance of that account as of the first day of the fiscal year in which the recommendation is made.

Nothing in this subsection prevents the governor from recommending an additional, alternative budget without the limitations specified in this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 34, § 1.

Except for an interfund loan made under W.S.

21-13-316

, an interfund loan from permanent funds for which an interest rate is not specified by law shall be charged an interest rate equal to the CPI for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the effective date of the interfund loan. “CPI” means the consumer price index for United States city average, all urban consumers, not seasonally adjusted, reported by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 9-276.18:67; Laws 1975, ch. 174, § 1; 1976, ch. 26, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-2019; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 120, § 1; 1993, ch. 125, § 1; 2000, ch. 80, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 2; 2003, ch. 34, § 1; 2009, ch. 207, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 180, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 13, 2019; 2020 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 124, § 2, effective April 6, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to legislative service office, see §§

28-8-101

through

28-8-114

.

As to legislative management council, see §§

28-9-101

through

28-9-108

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (d)(i), substituted “select school facilities committee under W.S.

28-11-301

” for “school facilities commission under W.S.

21-15-119

.”

The 2014 amendment,

in (a), inserted “electronic, or upon request” following “each legislator” and made stylistic changes in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (d)(ii), inserted “other” and “and as further provided herein” to the second sentence, and inserted the last sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (d)(ii), inserted “funds within the legislative stabilization reserve account in excess of the limitation under subparagraph (iii)(C) of this section” following “W.S. 9-4-719(f)” and added the last sentence; in (d)(iii), added “any of the following” at the end of the introductory language; added (d)(iii)(C) and (d)(iii)(D); redesignated (d)(v) as (d)(vi); added present (d)(v); and made a stylistic change in (d)(iii)(A).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (f).

The 2019 amendment,

in (a), substituted "the third Monday in November" for "December 1".

Laws 2019, ch. 5, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) added the last sentence.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, in (b), deleted "budget division of the" preceding "department" in the first sentence and "interim" preceding "committee" in the second sentence.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 124, § 2, added "appropriation under W.S.

9-2-1014

.3" in (d)(iii)(C);in (d)(iii)(D), added "by law other than W.S.

9-2-1014

.2 and 9-2-1014.3" and the last sentence; in the last sentence of (d)(v)(C), deleted "contingent" following "total of all" and added "including any appropriation under W.S. 9-2-1014.3."

Laws 2021, ch. 124, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 1993, ch. 125, § 3, provides: “The legislature declares that the intent of this act is to require, beginning with the 1994 budget session of the legislature and continuing thereafter, a means by which the governor and the legislature can comprehensively review proposed state expenditures within existing revenue sources for each budget period.”

Laws 1993, ch. 125, § 4, provides:

“(a)

The intent of this act is:

“(i)

To allow biennial review of state allocated funds regardless of whether they are appropriated from the general fund or earmarked by separate statute;

“(ii)

To allow for a comprehensive and comparative review of all programs authorized by or funded by the legislature. The primary purpose is to focus attention on achieving the highest priority goals and objectives of the state, particularly in times of restricted revenues and reduced spending;

“(iii)

To require a budget proposal from the executive department for program expenditures that would not exceed projected revenues and reserves over the biennial budget period.”

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides: “To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Cited

in

Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-2-1014.
Report required with budget request; format and contents of report; compilation of compendium of agency reports; distribution of copies.

An agency’s budget request to the department shall be accompanied by a written, comprehensive report of the programs, objectives, activities and condition covering the previous fiscal period. The report shall be in a format developed by the department and the department of administration and information, in conjunction with the agency and the legislative service office. Notice of the format requirements shall be forwarded to each agency no later than July 15 of each year. The report shall detail the fiscal affairs of the reporting agency including receipts and expenditures and make recommendations for improving the agency’s programs. The report shall include an annual performance report which provides a means of evaluation of the outcomes included in an agency strategic plan required by W.S.

28-1-115

and

28-1-116

.

Upon the receipt of all agency reports, the department of administration and information shall compile and index the information into a single compendium that will facilitate its use by the governor and the legislature. When preparing the compendium neither the department of administration and information nor the state budget department shall in any manner alter or amend the information received from an agency without that agency’s written direction. The report of any agency to the department is available pursuant to the Public Records Act.

Electronic or printed copies of the compendium and the state budget document shall be submitted to the governor and to each legislator. Printed copies of the compendium shall be furnished to the department and the state library division within the department of administration and information, the state auditor, the department of audit, the legislative service office and to any legislator requesting a printed copy.

For each submitted budget the joint appropriations committee shall review any budget shortfall or structural budget deficit identified by the governor or by the committee for the periods specified in W.S. 9-2-1013(d)(v). The committee shall report to the legislature the governor’s recommendations regarding any budget shortfall or structural budget deficit and the committee’s recommendations to the legislature to address a shortfall or deficit. The recommendations shall include:

Specific or general budget reductions;

Immediate contingent appropriations. Any recommendation for a contingent appropriation from the legislative stabilization reserve account shall be limited so that the total of all such contingent appropriations, together with any appropriation under W.S.

9-2-1014

.3, in any fiscal year does not exceed the lesser of one hundred eight million seven hundred thousand dollars ($108,700,000.00) or five percent (5%) of the balance of the account as of the first day of the fiscal year in which the recommendation is made;

Recommended expenditure of funds from the legislative stabilization reserve account and other expendable funds; and

Temporary redistribution of revenue streams.

In making its recommendations, the committee shall consider:

The forecasted length and amount of the shortfall or deficit;

The amount of funds available within the legislative stabilization reserve account and other expendable funds, and limitations on recommended contingent appropriations from the legislative stabilization account under this section and W.S. 9-2-1013(d)(v);

Services which would be affected by the budget shortfall or deficit, including any constitutional requirement or lack of a constitutional requirement to provide the services;

The ability to restructure programs and available revenues to address the budget shortfall or deficit;

Current and forecasted short term and long term economic conditions of the state;

Recommended depletion rates of expendable funds based upon:

Prudent short and long term savings policies for state government; and

The state’s revenue structure.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 54, § 4; 1890, ch. 5, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 180; C.S. 1910, § 262; C.S. 1920, § 302; R.S. 1931, § 109-1412; Laws 1933, ch. 17, § 1; 1941, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 18-105; W.S. 1957, § 9-21; Laws 1967, ch. 83, § 1; 1969, ch. 4, § 1; 1973, ch. 215, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1985, ch. 78, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 124, § 2, effective April 6, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to the powers and duties of state librarian, see §

9-2-1026

.6.

For meaning of “department,” see § 9-2-1002(a)(ii).

As to legislative service office, see §§

28-8-101

through

28-8-114

.

The 2014 amendment,

in (c), substituted “Electronic or printed copies of the compendium” for “The compendium” in the first sentence; substituted “Printed copies of” for “Copies of,” and added “and to any legislator requesting a printed copy” at the end of the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (d) and (e).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 56, § 3, added “and the department of administration and information” in the second sentence of (a); in (b), added “of administration and information” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added “neither” following “compendium” and “nor the state budget department,” substituted “any” for “no” preceding “manner”; in the second sentence of (c), substituted “department “ for “budget division,” added “of administration and information” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 124, § 2, added "W.S." preceding "9-2-1013(d)(v)" in the first sentence of (d); in (d)(ii), added "stabilization," ", together with any appropriation under W.S.

9-2-1014

.3," "the lesser of" and "or five percent (5%) of the balance of the account as of the first day of the fiscal year in which the recommendation is made."

Laws 2021, ch. 124, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

Public Records Act. —

The reference to the “Public Records Act” in subsection (b) is apparently a reference to §§

16-4-201

through

16-4-205

.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1906); Witzenburger v. State ex rel. Wyo. Community Dev. Auth., 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 9-2-1014.1.
State budget; requests by recipients of certain earmarked funds for additional funding from the budget reserve account.

Any state agency that receives federal mineral royalties or severance tax distributions may request additional funding from the budget reserve account as provided in this section.

The total amount available for the purpose of this section shall be the estimated deposits into the budget reserve account for the next biennial budget period under W.S. 9-4-601(d)(iv) and 39-14-801(d)(ii).

Any state agency eligible to request additional funds from the budget reserve account under this section shall submit its request as part of the budget process under W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

.

The governor shall include his recommendations for additional funding for state agencies and for local governments from the budget reserve account in his budget recommendation submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

to the legislature. His total recommendations under this section shall not exceed the total amount determined under subsection (b) of this section.

To the extent the legislature appropriates funds under this section from the budget reserve account for local governments, the appropriation shall comply with and be subject to the following:

The amount appropriated to local governments shall not exceed the amount available under subsection (b) of this section, less appropriations under this section to state agencies;

A total amount shall be annually appropriated to the state treasurer to be distributed to all local governments as follows:

Thirty percent (30%) to counties, in the proportion which the population of the county bears to total state population;

Seventy percent (70%) to cities and towns, each city and town to receive an amount in the proportion which the population of the city or town bears to the population of all cities and towns in Wyoming.

The distributions to local governments under this section shall be made by the state treasurer no later than October 15, of the fiscal year next following the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. The distributions shall be from revenues actually recognized in the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. Any interest earned on invested funds allocated to local governments under this section shall be retained in the budget reserve account.

To the extent that actual recognized revenues are less than the estimated deposits referenced in subsection (b) of this section:

The distribution of any appropriation to local governments under this section shall be reduced by a pro rata amount; and

The state auditor shall reduce the spending authority of any state agency receiving an appropriation under this section by a pro rata amount.

For the purpose of this section:

“Local government” means any county or municipality;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2.

“State agency” means the department of transportation, the University of Wyoming and the water development office.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 209, § 5; 2005, ch. 80, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 2; 2019 ch. 5, § 1, effective February 13, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, updated an internal reference to § 39-4-801 in (b).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (g)(ii), which read: “‘Population’ shall be determined by resort to the latest federal census as periodically updated by the bureau of the census.”

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), deleted "December 1" and added "submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

" in the first sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 5, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2019.

§ 9-2-1014.2
Budget shortfall measures; expenditure reductions; use of contingent appropriations.

The governor shall periodically review agency budgets and expenditures. If the governor determines during the review that the probable receipts from taxes or other sources of revenue for any fund or account will be less than were anticipated, and if the governor determines that these receipts plus existing revenues in the fund or account which are available will be less than the amount appropriated, the governor, after complying with the provisions of this section, shall give notice to the state agencies concerned and reduce the amount expended to prevent a deficit. In making any determination under this subsection the governor may but need not consider statutory authority to transfer appropriated funds or use a contingent appropriation to address revenue shortfalls. This subsection shall apply to all appropriations to state agencies regardless of whether the appropriation is for a specified project or purpose, including but not limited to capital construction projects. This subsection shall apply whether the appropriation is to be expended directly by an agency or is made to an agency for distribution to another entity.

Before any expenditure is reduced pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or if the governor otherwise determines that a shortfall in appropriated funds is likely at any time in a fiscal biennium prior to the convening of the next regular general or budget session of the legislature, the following actions shall be taken:

The governor shall notify the chairmen of the joint appropriations committee, the management council of the legislature and the chairmen of the consensus revenue estimating group of any proposed expenditure reduction and any recommended use of a contingent appropriation. The consensus revenue estimating group shall meet as soon as feasible, review its latest official revenue forecast and determine if adjustments should be made to that forecast in light of existing economic conditions;

The management council shall forward to the legislature the proposals and recommendations of the governor and assign review of the proposals and recommendations to various standing committees of the legislature as the council deems appropriate;

The joint appropriations committee shall determine if it should recommend the use of a contingent appropriation to offset any likely budget shortfall for the remainder of the fiscal biennium. In making this determination and any recommendation the committee shall consider:

The expenditure reductions that would be required without use of a contingent appropriation and the impact on services provided. The joint appropriations committee shall consider any comments received from any standing committee of the legislature regarding the potential impact on services;

The period of time any decline in revenues resulting in the budget shortfall is forecasted to last;

The availability of any other existing or projected funds to offset any predicted shortfall;

The amount of time before the next regular general or budget legislative session;

The percentage of the contingent appropriation needed to be used to ensure a budget shortfall will be alleviated until the end of either the fiscal biennium or the convening of a regular legislative session, as the joint appropriations committee deems in the best interests of the state.

The joint appropriations committee shall submit its recommendations to the governor not more than thirty (30) days after receiving notification under this section. After receiving the recommendation the governor may authorize the transfer of any contingent appropriation, subject to any condition placed on the contingent appropriation in the law making the appropriation, to any account or fund as he deems appropriate and to prevent a budget shortfall. The governor shall report all expenditure reductions and uses of contingent appropriations to the joint appropriations committee not later than ten (10) days after his action to implement the expenditure reduction or transfer contingent appropriations.

History.

2016 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 118, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2016. Approved March 15, 2016.

§ 9-2-1014.3.
Appropriation for public welfare emergencies; notification to legislature; legislative action.

Beginning July 1, 2021, as of the first day of each fiscal year, there is appropriated ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) from the legislative stabilization reserve account. The appropriation may be allocated by the governor and shall only be expended as authorized by the governor for public welfare emergencies as defined in W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(xxv). The governor’s office shall provide the notice required under W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii)(A) and (B) for any expenditure under this section in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).

Requests by a state department or agency for the allocation and expenditure of money appropriated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be made by the administrative head of the department or agency in writing to the governor specifying the circumstances which are deemed necessary to require the requested allocation and expenditure by the governor.

Expenditures pursuant to this section shall be through a program with an approved budget, but expenditures shall not be limited to the purposes of a program with an approved budget. No amount allocated to be expended pursuant to this section shall increase the standard budget of any program for a subsequent fiscal biennium.

Expenditures pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of W.S.

9-2-1014

.2.

History.

2021 ch. 124, § 1, effective April 6, 2021; enacted by 2021 ch. 124, § 1, effective April 6, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 124, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.

§ 9-2-1015.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 178, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 20, related to the governor's submission of a tentative budget bill to the state house and senate.

§ 9-2-1016.
General services division. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 21; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-276.18:69, 9-276.18:89; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 140, § 2; ch. 197, § 2; 1977, ch. 64, § 1; ch. 180, §§ 2, 3; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-2021, 9-3-2031; Laws 1978, ch. 29, § 1; 1979, ch. 10, § 2; ch. 157, § 2; 1981, ch. 115, § 1; ch. 120, § 1; 1982, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 139, § 1; ch. 191, § 2; 1987, ch. 88, § 2; 1988, ch. 15, § 1; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 54, § 1; ch. 241, § 3; 1994, ch. 57, § 1; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1997, ch. 99, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2005, ch. 181, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 64, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 302; 2013 ch. 9, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 105, §§
3, 4, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 108, § 3, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3204

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1017.
Professional liability insurance for peace officers; limits of policy; definition of peace officer. [Renumbered]

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 197, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-712.10; W.S. 1977, §

9-14-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1983, ch. 84, § 1; 1986, ch. 74, § 2; renumbered to Wyo. Stat. §

9-2-3205

by 2021 ch. 56, § 4, effective April 1, 2021.

§ 9-2-1018.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 203, § 23, related to information technology division; powers and duties.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.